Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.315

Health care—Evaluation and treatment.

Whenever a child is ordered removed from his or her home pursuant to this chapter, the agency charged with his or her care may authorize an evaluation and treatment for the child's routine and necessary medical, dental, or mental health care, and all necessary emergency care.

[ 2006 c 221 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—2006 c 221: "The legislature recognizes that foster children have enhanced health care needs and that it is necessary to improve the system of providing health care for foster children. The legislature further recognizes the importance of meeting the mental health needs of children in foster care, as well as their medical and dental health care needs. The legislature finds that there must be greater coordination and integration of systems, in particular coordination between children's administration and the health and recovery services administration as well as other agencies that provide or pay for health services for foster youth, to ensure that the health care needs of children in foster care are met in a timely manner." [ 2006 c 221 s 1.]